Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 2011
85-2416
Authorization to operate; renewal.

At least ninety
days prior to the expiration of its authorization to operate, a postsecondary
institution shall complete and file with the commission an application form
for renewal of its authorization to operate. Financial stability information
shall accompany the application.

Laws 2011, LB637, § 16.
May 5, 2011